North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 57A. Civil Liability of Farmers.

§ 106-706.
Exemption from civil liability for farmers permitting gleaning.

Any farmer, as an owner, lessee, occupant, or otherwise in control of land, who allows without compensation another person to enter upon the land for the purpose of removing any crops remaining in the farmer’s fields following the harvesting of the crops, owes that person the same duty of care the farmer owes a trespasser.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 868, s. 1.